Louisiana, session 2026, HB13.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:102(B)(3)(c) and (F) and 1332.1(B)(1)(b) and (d) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§102. Employer contributions; determination; state systems
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) With respect to each state public retirement system, the actuarially
required employer contribution for each fiscal year, commencing with Fiscal Year
1989-1990, shall be that dollar amount equal to the sum of:
* * *
(c) Except as provided in R.S. 11:102.1 and 102.2 and Paragraph (F)(2) of
this Section, that fiscal year's payment, computed as of the first of that fiscal year and
projected to the middle of that fiscal year at the actuarially assumed interest rate,
necessary to amortize the prior year's over or underpayment as a level dollar amount
over a period of five years.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 13 ENROLLED
F.(1)(a) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and in R.S.
11:102.5, effective July 1, 2009, and beginning with Fiscal Year 1992-1993, the
amortization period for the changes, gains, or losses of the Louisiana State Police
Retirement System provided in Items (B)(3)(d)(i) through (iv) of this Section shall
be thirty years from the year in which the change, gain, or loss occurred. The
outstanding balances of amortization bases established pursuant to Items (B)(3)(d)(i)
through (iv) of this Section before Fiscal Year 2008-2009 shall be amortized as a
level-dollar amount from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2029. Beginning with Fiscal
Year 2008-2009, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the outstanding balances of
amortization bases established pursuant to Items (B)(3)(d)(i) through (iv) of this
Section shall be amortized as a level-dollar amount.
(b) All outstanding amortization bases in existence on June 30, 2029,
including balances established pursuant to Subparagraph (B)(3)(c) of this Section,
shall be consolidated and reamortized over the period ending June 30, 2049, with
level-dollar payments, beginning July 1, 2029. Amortization bases established after
June 30, 2029, shall be amortized as provided in Subparagraph (2)(b) of this
Subsection.
(2)(a)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
effective for the June thirtieth valuation following the fiscal year in which the system
first attains a funded percentage of seventy or more pursuant to R.S. 11:1332 and for
every year thereafter, the amortization period for the changes, gains, or losses of the
system provided in Items (B)(3)(d)(i) through (iv) of this Section occurring in that
year or thereafter shall be twenty years from the year in which the change, gain, or
loss occurred.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (B)(3)(c) of this Section
to the contrary, the amortization period for the prior year's over or under payment for
the June 30, 2027, 2028, and 2029, valuations shall be twenty years.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection or
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph to the contrary, the amortization period for the
changes, gains, or losses of the system provided in Subparagraphs (B)(3)(c) and (d)
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 13 ENROLLED
of this Section with payments beginning July 1, 2030, or thereafter shall be fifteen
years from the year in which the change, gain, or loss occurred.
(3) Effective for the first system valuation following June 30, 2015, in which
an allocation is made to the system's experience account and for each valuation
thereafter, actuarial gains allocated to the experience account shall be amortized as
a loss with level payments over a ten-year period.
(4) In addition to the actuarially required employer contribution rate
determined pursuant to Subsection B of this Section, the legislature shall set the
permanent benefit increase account funding contribution rate as provided in this
Paragraph.
(a) Effective July 1, 2023, the rate provided for in this Paragraph, referred
to in this Subsection as the "AFC rate", shall be zero.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary,
effective for the June 30, 2023, system valuation and beginning July 1, 2024, for any
fiscal year in which the projected aggregate employer contribution rate decreases,
the AFC rate shall increase by the lesser of one-half of the amount of the decrease
in the projected aggregate employer contribution rate determined under this Section
or the amount necessary for the AFC rate to equal two and one-half percent. Any
increase in the AFC rate shall be permanent. The AFC rate shall not exceed two and
one-half percent.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
contributions required by this Paragraph shall not be considered actuarially required
contributions for the purposes of Paragraph (B)(3) of this Section or Article X,
Section 29(E) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary,
beginning with Fiscal Year 2027-2028, the required employer contribution rate for
a given year shall not be less than the projected employer normal cost divided by the
projected payroll of the active members of the system for the fiscal year plus the
AFC rate for that year.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 13 ENROLLED
§1332.1. Permanent benefit increase funding account
* * *
B.(1) The PBI account shall be credited as follows:
* * *
(b) To the extent permitted by Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph, all
employer contributions paid pursuant to R.S. 11:102(F)(4) R.S. 11:102(F)(3).
* * *
(d) In no event shall a credit be made to the PBI account that would cause
the balance in the account to exceed the reserve necessary to grant two permanent
benefit increases of two percent and two supplemental permanent benefit increases
of two percent in accordance with the provisions of this Section. Any contributions
received from payment of the account funding contribution rate in compliance with
R.S. 11:102(F)(4) R.S. 11:102(F)(3) that would cause the account balance to exceed
this reserve if deposited in the account shall be applied as provided in R.S. 11:102.4.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.